Maryland, session 2026, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–108.5.
(a) In this section, “State Board” means the State Board of Elections.
(B) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE THE DATE THAT IS 6 MONTHS BEFORE THE
CANDIDATE FILING DEADLINE FOR A MUNICIPAL ELECTION, THE MUNICIPALITY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE BOARD THE QUALIFICATIONS TO BE A CANDIDATE
FOR EACH OFFICE ON THE MUNICIPAL BALLOT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1448*

HOUSE BILL 1448
(II) IMMEDIATELY AFTER A MUNICIPALITY SUBMITS THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THE INFORMATION ON THE STATE BOARD’S
WEBSITE.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE THE DATE THAT IS 1 WEEK AFTER THE
CANDIDATE FILING DEADLINE FOR A MUNICIPAL ELECTION, THE MUNICIPALITY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE BOARD:
1. A LIST OF EACH QUALIFIED CANDIDATE FOR EACH
OFFICE ON THE MUNICIPAL BALLOT; AND
2. INFORMATION ON HOW TO VOTE AND WHERE TO VOTE
IN THE MUNICIPAL ELECTION.
(II) IMMEDIATELY AFTER A MUNICIPALITY SUBMITS THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THE INFORMATION ON THE STATE BOARD’S
WEBSITE.
[(b)] (C) (1) (I) The State Board shall, immediately after a municipality
submits its election results, publish the election results on the State Board’s website.
[(2)] (II) The election results published under [paragraph (1)]
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) of this [subsection] PARAGRAPH shall be organized by election year
and the name of the municipality.
[(c)] (2) Within 30 days after the results of a municipal election are certified,
the municipality shall submit to the State Board an electronic copy of the election results
for each office or question voted on at the election, including:
[(1)] (I) vote totals for each office or question reported separately by each
of the following voting methods, if applicable:
[(i)] 1. in–person early voting;
[(ii)] 2. mail–in voting or vote–by–mail;
[(iii)] 3. provisional voting; and
[(iv)] 4. in–person election day voting; and

HOUSE BILL 1448 3
[(2)] (II) if the municipality conducts partisan elections, the party
affiliation of each candidate.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.